Maine, session 132, LD465.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §353-B, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 631, §1, is
further amended to read:
A. The fees for waste discharge license groups are the 2019 bill amounts increased by
a factor of 1.4, unless otherwise indicated, as follows.
Discharge group Basis for Median fee for Water quality
annual fee discharge group improvement
surcharge
Publicly owned annual fee 2019 bill $543
treatment amount
facilities, 10,000
gallons per day
or less
Publicly owned annual fee 2019 bill $689
treatment amount
facilities, more
than 10,000
gallons per day
to 0.1 million
gallons per day
Publicly owned annual fee 2019 bill $1,063
treatment amount
facilities, more
than 0.1 million
gallons per day
to 1.0 million
gallons per day
Page 1 - 132LR0165(03)

Publicly owned annual fee 2019 bill $2,241
treatment amount
facilities, more
than 1.0 million
gallons per day
to 5.0 million
gallons per day
Publicly owned annual fee 2019 bill $7,850
treatment amount
facilities, greater
than 5 million
gallons per day
or with
significant
industrial waste
Major industrial annual fee 2019 bill $33,919
facility, process amount
wastewater
(based on EPA
list of major
source
discharges)
Other industrial annual fee 2019 bill $2,093
facility, process amount
wastewater
Food handling or annual fee 2019 bill $1,135
packaging amount
wastewater
Fish-rearing annual fee 2019 bill $538
Terrestrial fish- amount
rearing facility
0.1 million
gallons per day
or less
Fish-rearing annual fee 2019 bill $1,368
Terrestrial fish- amount
rearing facility
over 0.1 million
gallons per day
Page 2 - 132LR0165(03)

Marine annual fee 2019 bill $529
aquaculture amount
facility
Marine finfish annual fee $1,682 $1,682
aquaculture
facility
Noncontact annual fee 2019 bill $330
cooling water amount
Industrial or annual fee 2019 bill $626
commercial amount
sources,
miscellaneous or
incidental
nonprocess
wastewater
Municipal annual fee 2019 bill $711
combined sewer amount
overflow
Sanitary annual fee 2019 bill $1,268
wastewater, amount
excluding
overboard
discharge
Sanitary annual fee 2011 bill $446 $75
overboard amount
discharge,
commercial
sources
Sanitary annual fee 2011 bill $231 $75
overboard amount
discharge,
residential
sources 600
gallons per day
or less
Page 3 - 132LR0165(03)

Sanitary annual fee 2011 bill $313 $75
overboard amount
discharge,
residential
sources more
than 600 gallons
per day
Sanitary annual fee 2011 bill $315 $75
overboard amount
discharge, public
sources
Aquatic annual fee 2019 bill $1,110
pesticide amount
application
Snow dumps annual fee 2019 bill $550
amount
Salt and sand annual fee 2019 bill $738
storage pile amount
Log storage annual fee 2019 bill $727
permit amount
General permit annual fee 2019 bill $588
coverage for amount
industrial storm
water discharges
(except
construction)
General permit annual fee 2019 bill $230 $1,682
coverage for amount
marine $1,682
aquaculture
facility
General permit annual fee $1,306 $1,306
coverage for
municipal
separate storm
sewer system
General permit annual fee 2019 bill $283
coverage (other) amount
Page 4 - 132LR0165(03)

Experimental license fee 2019 bill $1,550
discharge license amount
New or amended flat fee $9,254 ---
mixing zone, in
addition to other
applicable fees
Formation of flat fee $693 ---
sanitary district
Transfer of flat fee $140 ---
license for
residential or
commercial
sanitary
wastewater
On an annual basis, municipalities and publicly owned treatment works whose
combined sewer overflows have the potential to affect shellfish harvesting areas as
determined by the department by virtue of their locations within estuarine or marine
waters of the State must be assessed a surcharge on their wastewater discharge licenses
in a total amount of $12,000. This amount must be allocated among the municipalities
and publicly owned treatment works according to their prior 3-year average annual
flows as reported to the department.
On an annual basis, publicly owned treatment works whose outfalls licensed for the
discharge of treated effluent cause adjacent shellfish growing areas to be closed for the
purposes of harvesting shellfish must be assessed a license surcharge in a total amount
of $25,000. This amount must be allocated among the publicly owned treatment works
according to the acreage that each licensed outfall closes. This acreage must be
determined by the Department of Marine Resources in consultation with the
department.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides allocations for expenditures that support activities for water quality
control operations, including licensing, compliance evaluation, monitoring, data
acquisition, data management and administration.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $55,791 $57,409
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $55,791 $57,409
Page 5 - 132LR0165(03)